noun/noun.xfst
# -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
################################################################################
# University of Zurich - Institute of Computational Linguistics
# Morphology anlysis for Romansh: Nouns
# Authors: Martina Bachmann, Melanie Widmer
# Modifications: Reto Baumgartner
# Date: June 2013
################################################################################

################################################################################
# Alphabet and tools
################################################################################
define Vowel [a|e|i|o|u|à|è|é|ì|ò|ù|y];
define Nonliquid [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|m|n|p|q|s|t|v|w|x|z];
define Consonant [Nonliquid|r|l];
define Letter [Vowel|Consonant];

## Cleanup
define Clean [\[Letter|"-"] -> 0];

################################################################################
# Irregular Nouns
################################################################################
## noun-irr contains irregular noun forms
read lexc  noun/noun-irr.lexc
define NounIrr;

################################################################################
# Loading regular nouns and adding PoS-tag
################################################################################
define FemNouns @txt"wordlists/noun-fem.txt";
define FemStems [FemNouns "+Noun":0];
define MascNouns @txt"wordlists/noun-masc.txt";
define MascStems [MascNouns "+Noun":0];
define PartNouns @txt"wordlists/noun-part.txt";
define PartStems [PartNouns "+Noun":0];

################################################################################
# Loading singular-only or plural-only words and adding all tags as these
# words are invariable.
################################################################################
define MascPlNouns @txt"wordlists/noun-masc-plur.txt";
define MascPlStems [MascPlNouns "+Noun":0 "+Masc":0 "+Pl":0];
define FemPlNouns @txt"wordlists/noun-fem-plur.txt";
define FemPlStems [FemPlNouns "+Noun":0 "+Fem":0 "+Pl":0];
define FemSgNouns @txt"wordlists/noun-fem-sing.txt";
define FemSgStems [FemSgNouns "+Noun":0 "+Fem":0 "+Sg":0];
define MascSgNouns @txt"wordlists/noun-masc-sing.txt";
define MascSgStems [MascSgNouns "+Noun":0 "+Masc":0 "+Sg":0];
# all collected
define Invariable [MascSgStems|MascPlStems|FemSgStems|FemPlStems];


################################################################################
# Adding Gender tag to the regular nouns
################################################################################
## gender tag
define RegGender [FemStems "+Fem":0 | [MascStems|PartStems] "+Masc":0];

################################################################################
# Forming the plural of the regular nouns
################################################################################
## regular number is formed; "*" is later used to prevent adding a further 's'
## after an existing 's' or 'ss'
define NumberTag ["+Sg":0|"+Pl":{"*"s}];
define RegGenderNumber [RegGender NumberTag];

## this rule applies to nouns which end in -s in the singular: it prevents double s
define sRule [{s"*"s} -> s];

## irregular number is formed
define eRule [{è"*"} -> {el} ];
define aRule [{à"*"} -> {ad} ];
define iRule [{ì"*"} -> {id} ];

################################################################################
# Dealing with compounds (also regular nouns)
################################################################################
### --- Compounds --- ###
## composita with hyphen 
define hyphRule1 [[..] -> s || _ "-" Letter+ [{"*"s}|{els}|{ads}|{ids}]];

## pluralising is undone in the second element of the compounds
define hyphRule2 [{"*"s} -> 0 || $["-"] _ ];

## pluralising is undone if the second element of the compounds is a noun that 
## has irregular number
define hyphRule3 [{els} -> è || $["-"] _ .#. ];
define hyphRule4 [{ads} -> à || $["-"] _ .#.];
define hyphRule5 [{ids} -> ì || $["-"] _ .#. ];
define hyphRules [hyphRule1 .o. hyphRule2 .o. hyphRule3 .o. hyphRule4 .o. hyphRule5];

################################################################################
# Final form of the regular nouns
################################################################################
## Composition of the rules for all other nouns
define RegularNouns [[RegGenderNumber .o. sRule .o. eRule .o. aRule .o. iRule
	.o. hyphRules] .o. Clean];

################################################################################
# Combining the implemented nouns
################################################################################
## Priority Union for the irregular noun forms and adding the invariable nouns
define Nouns [Invariable |[NounIrr .P. RegularNouns]];

################################################################################
# Proper nouns and abbreviations for nouns
################################################################################
#define AbbreviationsRaw @txt"wordlists/noun-abbr.txt";
#define Abbreviations [AbbreviationsRaw "+Noun":0 "+Abbr":0];

define ProperRaw [ @txt"wordlists/noun-proper.txt"
				| @txt"wordlists/noun-proper-giv-masc.txt"
				| @txt"wordlists/noun-proper-giv-fem.txt"] ;
define Proper [ProperRaw "+Prop":0];

################################################################################
# Guessing Noun Forms for Hypothetical Nouns
# Only Regular nouns, composita and nouns in -è (-à, -ì are modellised as 
# participles. 
################################################################################
define GuessingFem [
	Letter* Vowel+ Letter* "+Noun":0 "+Fem":0 ["+Sg":0|"+Pl":s]];

define GuessingMasc [
	Letter* Vowel+ Letter* "+Noun":0 "+Masc":0 ["+Sg":0|"+Pl":s]];

define GuessingMascEls [
	Letter* Vowel+ Letter* {è}:0 "+Noun":0 "+Masc":0 [ "+Sg":è |"+Pl":{els} ]];

define GuessingCompPart2 ["-" Letter* Vowel+ Letter*];
define GuessingComposita [
	Letter* Vowel+ Letter* [
	[           GuessingCompPart2 "+Noun":0 "+Fem":0  "+Sg":0 ]|
	[ 0:{s}     GuessingCompPart2 "+Noun":0 "+Fem":0  "+Pl":0 ]|
	[           GuessingCompPart2 "+Noun":0 "+Masc":0 "+Sg":0 ]|
	[ 0:{s}     GuessingCompPart2 "+Noun":0 "+Masc":0 "+Pl":0 ]|
	[ {è}       GuessingCompPart2 "+Noun":0 "+Masc":0 "+Sg":0 ]|
	[ {è}:{els} GuessingCompPart2 "+Noun":0 "+Masc":0 "+Pl":0 ]]];

define GuessingNoun [GuessingFem|GuessingMasc|GuessingMascEls|GuessingComposita];

################################################################################
# Saving the networks for further processing
################################################################################
read regex [Nouns|Abbreviations|Proper] ;
save stack fstbinaries/Noun.fst
clear stack

read regex GuessingNoun ;
save stack fstbinaries/NounGuessing.fst
